California, session 20252026, AB2134.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 36513 of the Government Code is amended to read:36513. (a) If a city council member is absent without permission from all regular city council meetings for 60 days consecutively from the last regular meeting they attended, their office becomes vacant and shall be filled as any other vacancy.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a city council meets monthly or less frequently than monthly and a city council member is absent without permission from all regular city council meetings for 70 days consecutively from the last regular meeting they attended, their office becomes vacant and shall be filled as any other vacancy.(c) A city shall establish a process for a city council member to notify the city clerk or other designated official, in writing, that they are taking parental leave. The process shall not require the city council member to make that declaration at a public meeting. (d) Parental leave shall not count toward the existing number of allowed absences allotted to each council member.(e) For purposes of this section, “parental leave” means leave for reasons of the birth of a child of the employee, city council member, or the placement of a child with an employee a city council member in connection with the adoption or foster care of the child by the employee. city council member. Parental leave shall be limited to 12 workweeks or the length of time allowed pursuant to the parental leave provided to employees of the applicable council member’s city, whichever is longer.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that, because all councilmembers across the State of California should have uniform protections when starting or growing a family, this act is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair, as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act amending Section 36513 of the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which amends Section 36513 of the Government Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to protect the privacy of city council members, the limitation on the public’s right of access imposed by Section 1 of this act is necessary.